Hawaii, session 2026, HB2524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a) The auditor shall conduct an audit of the department of education for fiscal years 2024-2025 and 2025‑2026. The audit shall focus on financial efficiency and administrative overhead costs affecting department of education schools on the island of Oahu. (b)  The auditor shall submit the audit report to the legislature and department of education no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028.  The auditor may contract the audit services of a third party to conduct the audit. SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________